District of Columbia statutes.
7-2005

Repayment.

(a)

For each loan issued under this subchapter, the Mayor shall arrange a repayment schedule.

(b)

Each loan granted from the fund shall be recorded as a lien against the real and personal property of the applicant.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-220, § 6, 36 DCR 550

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3605.

Editor's Notes

Because of the codification of D.C. Law 12-215 as subchapter II of this chapter, the designation of the preexisting text as subchapter I, “subchapter” has been substituted for “chapter” in subsection (a).